Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF5096.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 471.59, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Services performed by countynew text begin or sheriffnew text end , commonality of powers. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 1 requiring commonality of powers between parties to any agreement the board of county commissioners of any county may by resolution enter into agreements with any other governmental unit as defined in subdivision 1 to perform on behalf of that unit any service or function which that unit would be authorized to provide for itself. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 1 requiring commonality of powers, a county sheriff must enter into an agreement under United States Code, title 8, section 1357(g), with a federal agency to perform services or functions the federal agency is authorized to provide. A county sheriff does not require authorization from a county board of commissioners before entering into an agreement under this paragraph. new text end